Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-733
Removal of designation management area or requirement of action plan; modification of boundaries; when.

A district may petition the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment to remove the director's designation of the area as a management area or the requirement of an action plan for a management area or to modify the boundaries of a management area designated pursuant to section 46-725. If the director determines that the level of contamination in a management area has stabilized at or been reduced to a level which is not detrimental to beneficial uses of ground water, he or she may remove the designation or action plan requirement or modify the boundaries of the management area.

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-674.14;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 53;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.47;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 73;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 41;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 231.